Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-275
Electronic,
mechanical, or other device, defined.

Electronic,
mechanical, or other device means any device or apparatus which can be used
to intercept a wire, electronic, or oral communication other than:

(1) Any telephone or telegraph instrument, equipment, or
facility, or any component thereof, (a) furnished to the subscriber or user
by a provider in the ordinary course of its business and being used by the
subscriber or user in the ordinary course of its business or furnished by
such subscriber or user for connection to the facilities of such service and
used by the subscriber or user in the ordinary course of its business or (b)
being used by a provider in the ordinary course of its business or by an investigative
or law enforcement officer in the ordinary course of his or her duties; or

(2) A hearing instrument or similar device
being used to correct subnormal hearing to not better than normal.

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 137;

Laws 2009, LB195, § 109.